Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2148.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIII-FWELCOMING SCHOOLSSection 1301-F. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Enforcement agency." An immigration enforcement agency or a law enforcement agency."Enforcement official." An official of an enforcement agency."Immigration enforcement agency." The United States Department of Homeland Security and its subagencies, including, but not limited to:(1) United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, including Homeland Security Investigations.(2) United States Customs and Border Protection.(3) United States Marshals Service.(4) United States Drug Enforcement Administration.(5) United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives.(6) Any State or local law enforcement agency acting on behalf of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or an agent or officer for any Federal, State or local agency attempting to enforce Federal immigration law.(7) Any:(i) individual authorized to conduct enforcement of Federal immigration laws; or(ii) Federal agent charged with enforcement of civil immigration laws."Law enforcement agency." Any of the following:(1) A police department of a city, borough, incorporated town or township.(2) The Pennsylvania State Police.20260HB2148PN2774 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A district attorney's office.(4) The Office of Attorney General of the Commonwealth.(5) A sheriff or deputy sheriff."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school."School personnel." An individual within the control of or acting on behalf of a school district, including, but not limited to, a school district employee, school bus driver of a school-district-owned bus, after-school provider, contractor, consultant, volunteer, vendor, school security officer, school resource officer as defined in section 1301-C or service provider."School zone." School property owned by, leased by or under the control of a school entity.Section 1302-F. Welcoming schools.Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and each year thereafter, each school entity shall provide assurance of continued access of the school entity's school zones to each student, parent, guardian and school personnel, regardless of immigration status.Section 1303-F. Resolution.(a) Policies and procedures required.--Within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection, each school entity shall develop policies and procedures for creating and promoting an inclusive learning environment in accordance with section 1304-F.(b) Resolution required.--Each board of directors or governing body of a school entity shall adopt the policies and procedures by resolution, which must be adopted by majority vote 20260HB2148PN2774 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at a public meeting. At least 45 days prior to the public meeting, the board of directors or governing body shall make available for public inspection the resolution proposed for adoption.(c) Publication of resolution.--A school entity shall make the resolution required under subsection (b) available, in each language spoken by a student at the student's home, to all students, parents, guardians and school personnel no less than 30 days prior to the public meeting required under subsection (b). A school entity shall publish the resolution in the same manner and as a part of the publication of notice of the public meeting.(d) Review and amendment of policies and procedures.--No later than 30 days before the beginning of each school year, and thereafter each quarter of the school year, a school entity shall review the policies and procedures adopted under this section. If amendment of the policies and procedures is necessary, the school entity shall amend its policies and procedures through the resolution process specified in this section.Section 1304-F. Policy and procedure.(a) Requirements.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a school entity shall adopt policies and procedures for creating and promoting a welcoming and inclusive learning environment in accordance with this article. The policies and procedures shall include the following requirements:(1) A school entity shall designate a superintendent, other chief administrative officer or school personnel to perform the duties and to respond under this article to any request under this article to enter any part of its school 20260HB2148PN2774 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 zone . (2) A school entity shall designate areas of the school zone that are:(i) public with entry accessible to the public, including lobby and waiting areas;(ii) nonpublic with entry prohibited to the public, including the interior areas of a school building, a school bus or the area designated for arrival or departure of students traveling by school bus; and(iii) areas with adjustable status of public and nonpublic dependent on time and usage of area. A school entity shall develop guidelines for adjustable status.(3) A school entity shall post signage for: (i) designated public or nonpublic areas; and(ii) adjustable areas. (4) If an officer or agent of an immigration enforcement agency requests entry to a school zone, regardless of a presentment of a signed judicial warrant, the designated school personnel shall:(i) P rovide the officer or agent with a copy of the welcoming schools resolution.(ii) R equest official identification and contact information from the officers or agents and photocopy the identification and information for the school entity's record.(iii) D ocument statements and grounds for the request made by the officer or agent requesting entry and statements or acts taken by any officer or agent present.(iv) D ocument the names of any students or school personnel identified by the officer or agent.20260HB2148PN2774 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) P rovide digital transmittal of all documentation to the school entity solicitor.(5) The designated school personnel shall:(i) request an enforcement official to present to the designated school personnel a signed judicial warrant that properly extends to the school zone where the subject of the warrant is located; and (ii) photocopy the warrant provided to the school entity for its record and for concurrent digital transmittal to the school entity solicitor.(6) The designated school personnel has no authority to consent to entry and the enforcement official or agent's request to enter the school entity's premises is deemed denied in the event that any of the following factors exist:(i) the enforcement official fails to present a signed judicial warrant;(ii) the enforcement official presents a judicial warrant that is not signed;(iii) the enforcement official presents a judicial warrant that is incomplete, contains inaccurate information or is otherwise improper; or(iv) the enforcement official presents an administrative warrant and no exigent circumstances are specifically claimed to exist.(7) A contract or agreement entered into by a school entity with a school bus company or operator after the effective date of this paragraph shall include a provision that prohibits the company, operator or its employees from:(i) assisting or providing personal information related to a student assigned to a bus provided by the 20260HB2148PN2774 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school bus company or operator, including the student's name, home address, bus stop or immigration status; or(ii) permitting an enforcement official or agent to enter the bus if at least one factor under paragraph (6) exists.(8) (i) Regardless of whether within a school zone or situate outside the boundaries of a school zone, an individual who is deemed school personnel may not:(A) inquire into the immigration status of a student, a student's family, parent or guardian; or(B) formally or informally provide or discuss information related to the immigration status of a student, a student's parent or guardian, a member of the student's family or an individual who is deemed school personnel.(ii) The board of directors or governing body of a school entity must establish a disciplinary process and procedure for an individual who is deemed school personnel and who violates subparagraph (i).(9) School personnel must refuse an enforcement official's entry to a school zone for the purpose of a wellness check when the designated school personnel, at the personnel's discretion, determines the wellness check requires a lawful warrant.(10) In the event circumstances permit, a request made by an immigration enforcement agency or other enforcement agency for access to a school entity's building, facility, grounds, school zone or school bus must be directed to the school entity's superintendent and school solicitor 24 hours before the requested time of entry for determination of 20260HB2148PN2774 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whether to grant the request. The requesting official must:(i) present official credentials;(ii) have the proper signed judicial warrant; and(iii) receive written approval from the superintendent to enter the school entity's building, facility, grounds or school zone.(11) Regarding a student's parent or guardian, or the student when the student is over 18 years of age, the school entity shall:(i) not share student records or other confidential information protected by Federal or State law; and(ii) provide notice of the right to opt out of disclosing directory information such as a home address and place of birth at least twice a year in August and January.(b) Notification.--The school entity shall notify the parent or guardian of any student subject to a request for access or entry to a school entity or school zone by an immigration enforcement agency or an enforcement agency within 48 hours of the request.(c) Review of existing policy.--A school entity that previously adopted a policy satisfying the requirements of subsection (a) shall review and update, if necessary, the existing policy.Section 1305-F. Training.(a) Content of training.--A school entity shall provide school personnel with training that ensures that school personnel understand and are knowledgeable about:(1) the school policies required under this article;(2) determining the scope of a valid judicial warrant, 20260HB2148PN2774 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including the distinction between a signed judicial warrant and an administrative warrant;(3) the requirements and effect of a wellness check;(4) when a request for a wellness check exceeds the boundaries of a wellness check; and(5) the procedures to follow and that the required compliance is critical and understood by the school personnel.(b) Annual training.--A school entity shall annually provide training required in this section at least 15 days prior to the beginning of each school year. In the event school policies required in this article are amended by resolution and adopted under section 1303-F, training required in this section shall occur within 15 days of the adoption of a resolution.Section 1306-F. Professional development.(a) Training required.--(1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and each year thereafter, each school entity shall include in the school entity's professional development plan submitted to the department for approval pursuant to section 1205.1 four hours of training required under section 1305-F related to the following:(i) Creating and promoting welcoming schools.(ii) Implementation of the policies of the school entity under this article.(iii) Limitations on enforcement agency ability to disrupt a student's right to an education.(iv) Ensuring the privacy of student records as required by Federal and State law, including the right of a parent, guardian or student who is over the age of 18 20260HB2148PN2774 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to opt out of sharing directory information.(2) A school entity may use the materials made available by the department under subsection (b).(b) Information required to be posted.--The department shall compile, develop and post the following on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, which may include materials already publicly available:(1) Recommended guidelines and educational materials for the training required under subsection (a).(2) Recommended resources and age-appropriate education materials on a right to education, the right to access an education free from fear of immigration enforcement and the safeguards on the release of information without consent.(3) Recommended responses to requests for information or access at a school entity or a school zone.(4) Recommended guidelines and education materials for anti-bullying at a school entity or school zone and awareness and prevention of bullying related to immigration status, ethnicity or national origins.(5) Recommended individual and schoolwide supportive services and restorative school climate programming to address any fear and trauma experienced by students and school personnel from actual or potential enforcement action.Section 1307-F. Report.No later than five days after an action by an enforcement agent occurs at a school entity or school zone, the superintendent shall submit a written incident report to the board of directors or governing body of the school entity. The incident report shall contain the following information:(1) The date and location in which the action was 20260HB2148PN2774 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requested, whether granted or denied by the designated school personnel of the school entity.(2) The type of action, whether a request for information or a request for entry.(3) The number of individuals, if any, arrested or taken into custody because of granting the request for information or entry to the school zone.(4) The requesting enforcement agency, department and official responsible for the action.(5) Written notes recorded by the designated school personnel of the school entity documenting:(i) requests made by the enforcement official;(ii) action taken by the enforcement official while in the school zone;(iii) the enforcement official's treatment of the subject of the warrant;(iv) the enforcement official's treatment of the student population of the school entity, if any occurred;(v) the enforcement official's treatment of the school personnel; and(vi) whether the designated school personnel or any other individual in the school zone witnessed any act by the enforcement official that appeared to have exceeded the lawful authority of the enforcement official while executing the warrant.(6) A thorough description of the circumstances that purportedly justified the action.(7) A copy of the credentials provided by the enforcement official, including a copy of the official's identification documents and any warrant and subpoena.20260HB2148PN2774 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) An overview of individual supportive services and schoolwide restorative school climate programming available and offered to students and personnel.Section 1308-F. Department guidelines.Within 30 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall develop and publish guidelines to assist school entities in the implementation of this article. The department shall review and update the guidelines, as necessary, but no less than annually. The department shall post guidelines issued under this section on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2148PN2774 - 12 - 123456789101112